pt-BR: Cobertura forma: Crumble; Creme ou coalhada; Fio de cobertura; Mistura seca; Compota de frutas; Glacê; Cobertura de nozes; Pasta; Mistura em pó; Calda; Creme para barrar; Granulado; Borda de açúcar ou sal; Xarope; Cobertura batida; Outros
pt-PT: Formato da cobertura: Crumble; Creme pasteleiro ou coalhada; Fio; Mistura seca; Compota de fruta; Glacé; Cobertura de frutos secos; Pasta; Mistura em pó; Molho; Para barrar; Granulado; Bordo de açúcar ou sal; Xarope; Cobertura batida; Outro
it: Forma del topping: Crumble; Crema pasticcera o curd; A filo; Preparato secco; Composta di frutta; Glassa; Granella di noci/nocciole; Pasta; Preparato in polvere; Salsa; Crema spalmabile; Zuccherini; Bordo di zucchero o sale; Sciroppo; Guarnizione montata; Altro
sl-SI: Oblika preliva oziroma posipa: Drobljenec; Krema ali sadna krema (curd); Preliv (drizzle); Suha mešanica; Sadni kompot; Glazura; Posip iz oreščkov; Pasta; Mešanica v prahu; Omaka; Namaz; Posip; Sladkorni ali slani rob; Sirup; Stepen preliv; Drugo
zh-CN: 配料形态: 酥脆碎; 卡仕达酱或凝乳; 淋酱; 干粉混合物; 糖煮水果; 糖釉; 坚果碎; 糊状; 粉状混合物; 酱汁; 涂抹酱; 糖珠; 糖边或盐边; 糖浆; 打发鲜奶油; 其他
cs: Podoba polevy: Drobenka; Pudink nebo krém (curd); Poleva na zakápnutí; Suchá směs; Ovocný rozvar; Glazura; Ořechová posypka; Pasta; Sypká směs; Přeliv; Pomazánka; Posyp; Cukrový nebo solný okraj; Sirup; Šlehaná poleva; Jiné
bg-BG: Форма на топинга: Натрошен; Крем; Заливка; Сух микс; Плодово компоте; Глазура; Ядкова поръска; Паста; Микс на прах; Сос; Продукт за мазане; Поръска; Захарен или солен ръб; Сироп; Бит топинг; Друго
ru: Форма топпинга: Крошка; Заварной крем или курд; Поливка; Сухая смесь; Фруктовый компоте; Глазурь; Ореховый топпинг; Паста; Порошковая смесь; Соус; Спред; Посыпка; Сахарная или соляная каёмка; Сироп; Взбитый топпинг; Другое
hr-HR: Oblik za preljev: Mrvice; Krema od jaja ili voća (curd); Preljev; Suha mješavina; Voćni kompot; Glazura; Preljev s orašastim plodovima; Pasta; Mješavina u prahu; Umak; Namaz; Posip; Rub od šećera ili soli; Sirup; Tučeni preljev; Ostalo
da: Toppingform: Crumble; Custard eller curd; Drizzle; Tør blanding; Frugtkompot; Glasering; Nøddetopping; Pasta; Pulverblanding; Sauce; Smørepålæg; Krymmel; Sukker- eller saltkant; Sirup; Pisket topping; Andet
pl: Forma polewy: Kruszonka; Krem budyniowy lub owocowy (curd); Polewa; Sucha mieszanka; Owoce w syropie (kompot); Glazura; Posypka orzechowa; Pasta; Mieszanka w proszku; Sos; Smarowidło; Posypka; Obwódka z cukru lub soli; Syrop; Ubita śmietanka; Inna
sk-SK: Formulár na posýpku: Mrvenička; Puding alebo krém; Jemná poleva (drizzle); Suchá zmes; Ovocný kompót; Poleva; Orechová posýpka; Pasta; Prášková zmes; Omáčka; Nátierka; Posýpka; Cukrový alebo soľný okraj; Sirup; Šľahačka; Iné
lt-LT: Užpilo forma: Trupiniai; Kremas ar varškė; Užpilas; Sausas mišinys; Vaisių kompotas; Glajus; Riešutų pabarstukai; Pasta; Miltelių mišinys; Padažas; Užtepas; Pabarstukai; Cukraus ar druskos kraštelis; Sirupas; Plaktas kremas; Kita
fi: Täytteen muoto: Muru; Vaniljakastike tai curd; Valutettava; Kuivasekoitus; Hedelmäkompotti; Kuorrutus; Pähkinärouhe; Tahna; Jauhesekoitus; Kastike; Levite; Strösseli; Sokeri- tai suolareunus; Siirappi; Vaahtokuorrute; Muu
ja: トッピング形状: クランブル; カスタード/カード; ドリズル; ドライミックス; フルーツコンポート; グレーズ; ナッツトッピング; ペースト; パウダーミックス; ソース; スプレッド; スプリンクル; シュガー/ソルトリム; シロップ; ホイップトッピング; その他
th: แบบฟอร์มท็อปปิ้ง: ครัมเบิล; คัสตาร์ดหรือเคิร์ด; สำหรับราด; ส่วนผสมแห้ง; ผลไม้เชื่อม; เกลซ; ท็อปปิ้งถั่ว; เพสต์; ผงผสม; ซอส; สเปรด; สำหรับโรย; น้ำตาลหรือเกลือเคลือบขอบแก้ว; น้ำเชื่อม; วิปครีมท็อปปิ้ง; อื่นๆ
de: Form des Toppings: Streusel; Pudding oder Quark; Fadenglasur; Trockenmischung; Fruchtkompott; Glasur; Nuss-Topping; Paste; Pulvermischung; Soße; Aufstrich; Streusel; Zucker- oder Salzrand; Sirup; Sahne-Topping; Sonstige
vi: Hình thức phủ trên: Vụn bánh; Sốt trứng sữa hoặc curd; Dạng rưới; Hỗn hợp khô; Trái cây rim đường (compote); Lớp men bóng; Hạt rắc; Dạng nhão; Hỗn hợp bột; Nước xốt; Mứt phết; Kẹo rắc; Viền đường hoặc muối; Xi-rô; Kem tươi đánh bông; Khác
sv: Toppingform: Smulor; Kräm eller curd; Ringlad sås; Torrblandning; Fruktkompott; Glasyr; Nöttopping; Pasta; Pulverblandning; Sås; Pålägg; Strössel; Socker- eller saltkant; Sirap; Vispad topping; Övrigt
ko: 토핑 형태: 크럼블; 커스터드 또는 커드; 드리즐; 건조 믹스; 과일 콤포트; 글레이즈; 견과류 토핑; 페이스트; 가루 믹스; 소스; 스프레드; 스프링클; 설탕 또는 소금 림; 시럽; 휘핑 토핑; 기타
nb: Toppingform: Smuler; Krem eller curd; Drizzle; Tørrblanding; Fruktkompott; Glasur; Nøttetopping; Pasta; Pulverblanding; Saus; Pålegg; Strø; Sukker- eller saltkant; Sirup; Pisket krem/topping; Annet
nl: Topping vorm: Crumble; Custard of curd; Drizzle; Droge mix; Vruchtencompote; Glazuur; Notentopping; Pasta; Poedermix; Saus; Spread; Strooigoed; Suiker- of zoutrand; Siroop; Geklopte topping; Overige
zh-TW: 配料形態: 奶酥; 卡士達或凝乳; 淋醬; 乾拌料; 糖煮水果; 鏡面果膠; 堅果配料; 泥狀; 粉狀拌料; 醬料; 抹醬; 撒粉; 糖口或鹽口; 糖漿; 打發鮮奶油; 其他
hu: Feltétforma: Morzsa; Sodó vagy krém; Öntet; Száraz keverék; Gyümölcskompót; Máz; Diós/mogyorós feltét; Paszta; Porkeverék; Szósz; Kenhető krém; Szórás; [Cukor- vagy sóperem, Cukor- vagy sóperemek]; Szirup; Tejszínhabos feltét; Egyéb
fr: Forme de la garniture: Crumble; Crème ou curd; Filet; Mélange sec; Compote de fruits; Glaçage; Garniture aux noix; Pâte; Mélange en poudre; Sauce; Pâte à tartiner; Garniture à saupoudrer; Rebord givré au sucre ou au sel; Sirop; Garniture fouettée; Autre
es: Forma de cobertura: Crumble; Crema o cuajada; Chorrito; Mezcla seca; Compota de frutas; Glaseado; Cobertura de frutos secos; Pasta; Mezcla en polvo; Salsa; Crema para untar; Chispas/granillo; Borde de azúcar o sal; Jarabe; Cobertura batida; Otro
el: Μορφή επικάλυψης: Τριμμένο; Κρέμα (custard ή curd); Drizzle; Ξηρό μείγμα; Κομπόστα φρούτων; Γλάσο; Επικάλυψη ξηρών καρπών; Πάστα; Μείγμα σε σκόνη; Σος; Άλειμμα; Τρούφα; Ζάχαρη ή αλάτι στο χείλος; Σιρόπι; Επικάλυψη από σαντιγί; Άλλο
ro-RO: Formă de topping: Crumble; Cremă de ou sau curd; Sos turnat; Amestec uscat; Compot de fructe; Glazură; Topping de nuci; Pastă; Amestec pudră; Sos; Cremă tartinabilă; Bombonele decorative; Margine cu zahăr sau sare; Sirop; Topping bătut; Altele
en: Topping form: Crumble; Custard or curd; Drizzle; Dry mix; Fruit compote; Glaze; Nut topping; Paste; Powder mix; Sauce; Spread; Sprinkle; Sugar or salt rim; Syrup; Whipped topping; Other
tr: Üst malzeme formu: Kırıntı; Krema veya lor; Gezdirilmiş sos; Kuru karışım; Meyve kompostosu; Glazür; Kuruyemiş kaplaması; Ezme; Toz karışım; Sos; Sürülebilir; Serpme; Şeker veya tuz kenarı; Şurup; Çırpılmış krema; Diğer